Georgia statutes. TITLE 2 Agriculture
Article 7 Pick-your-own Farm Operations

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 enactment of this article, see 18 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2001).

2-14-150.
Legislative declarations; intent.

The General Assembly recognizes that persons who patronize farms specializing in pick-your-own agricultural products may incur injuries as a result of the risks involved in such activity. The General Assembly also finds that the state and its citizens derive numerous economic and personal benefits from such activity. The General Assembly finds, determines, and declares that this article is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety. It is, therefore, the intent of the General Assembly to encourage the direct sale of agricultural products from farmers to the general public by limiting the civil liability of farmers involved in such activity.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-14-150

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1249, § 1.

2-14-151.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Agricultural products” means Christmas trees, fruits, vegetables, pecans, nuts, horticultural products, and other such fresh farm products that are made available to the general public through pick-your-own farm operations.

“Participant” means any person who enters the farm location, singly or with a group, for the purpose of harvesting fresh farm products from pick-your-own farm operations.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-14-151

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1249, § 1.

2-14-152.
Liability of farm owner or operator.

Except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, the owner or operator of any farm specializing in pick-your-own agricultural products shall not be liable for an injury to or the death of a participant resulting from the inherent risks of harvesting agricultural products, and, except as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section, no participant or participant’s representative shall make any claim against, maintain an action against, or recover from an owner or operator, or any other person or entity for injury, loss, damage, or death of the participant resulting from any of the inherent risks of harvesting agricultural products.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this Code section shall prevent or limit the liability of an owner or operator or any other person or entity if the owner or operator:

Owns, leases, rents, or otherwise is in lawful possession and control of the land upon which the participant sustained injuries because of a dangerous latent condition which was known or should have been known to the owner or operator;

Commits an act or omission that constitutes willful or wanton disregard for the safety of the participant, and that act or omission caused the injury; or

Intentionally injures the participant.

Nothing in subsection (a) of this Code section shall prevent or limit the liability of an owner or operator under liability provisions as set forth in the product liability laws.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-14-152

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1249, § 1.

2-14-153.
Warning notices required; effect of failure to comply with notice requirements.

Every owner and operator of a pick-your-own farm operation shall post and maintain white signs which contain the warning notice specified in subsection (b) of this Code section. Such signs shall be placed in a clearly visible location near the entrance of the farm. The warning notice specified in subsection (b) of this Code section shall appear on the sign in black letters, with each letter to be a minimum of one inch in height. Every written contract entered into by an owner or operator shall contain in clearly readable print the warning notice specified in subsection (b) of this Code section.

The signs and contracts described in subsection (a) of this Code section shall contain the following warning notice:

“Under Georgia law, an owner or operator of a pick-your-own farm location is not liable for an injury to or the death of a participant from the inherent risks of harvesting agricultural products, pursuant to Article 7 of Chapter 14 of Title 2 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated.”

Failure to comply with the requirements concerning warning signs and notices provided in this Code section shall not prevent an owner or operator from invoking the privileges of immunity provided by this article.

History.

Code 1981, §

2-14-153

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1249, § 1.